Utah statutes.
10-2-403.   Annexation petition -- Requirements -- Notice required before
filing.
(1)  Except as provided in Section 10-2-418, the process to annex an
unincorporated area to a municipality is initiated by a petition as provided
in this section.
(2) (a) (i)  Before filing a petition under Subsection (1) with respect to the
proposed annexation of an area located in a county of the first class, the
person or persons intending to file a petition shall:
(A)  file with the city recorder or town clerk of the proposed annexing
municipality a notice of intent to file a petition; and
(B)  send a copy of the notice of intent to each affected entity.
(ii)  Each notice of intent under Subsection (2)(a)(i) shall include an
accurate map of the area that is proposed to be annexed.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b)(ii), the county in which the area
proposed to be annexed is located shall:
(A)  mail the notice described in Subsection (2)(b)(iii) to:
(I)  each owner of real property located within the area proposed to be
annexed; and
(II)  each owner of real property located within 300 feet of the area proposed
to be annexed; and
(B)  send to the proposed annexing municipality a copy of the notice and a
certificate indicating that the notice has been mailed as required under
Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A).
(ii)  The county shall mail the notice required under Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A)
within 20 days after receiving from the person or persons who filed the notice
of intent:
(A)  a written request to mail the required notice; and
(B)  payment of an amount equal to the county's expected actual cost of
mailing the notice.
(iii)  Each notice required under Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A) shall:
(A)  be in writing;
(B)  state, in bold and conspicuous terms, substantially the following:
"Attention: Your property may be affected by a proposed annexation.
Records show that you own property within an area that is intended to be
included in a proposed annexation to (state the name of the proposed annexing
municipality) or that is within 300 feet of that area.  If your property is
within the area proposed for annexation, you may be asked to sign a petition
supporting the annexation.  You may choose whether or not to sign the
petition.  By signing the petition, you indicate your support of the proposed
annexation.  If you sign the petition but later change your mind about
supporting the annexation, you may withdraw your signature by submitting a
signed, written withdrawal with the recorder or clerk of (state the name of
the proposed annexing municipality) within 30 days after (state the name of
the proposed annexing municipality) receives notice that the petition has been
certified.
There will be no public election on the proposed annexation because Utah law
does not provide for an annexation to be approved by voters at a public
election.  Signing or not signing the annexation petition is the method under
Utah law for the owners of property within the area proposed for annexation to
demonstrate their support of or opposition to the proposed annexation.
You may obtain more information on the proposed annexation by contacting
(state the name, mailing address, telephone number, and email address of the
official or employee of the proposed annexing municipality designated to
respond to questions about the proposed annexation), (state the name, mailing
address, telephone number, and email address of the county official or
employee designated to respond to questions about the proposed annexation), or
(state the name, mailing address, telephone number, and email address of the
person who filed the notice of intent under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A), or, if
more than one person filed the notice of intent, one of those persons).  Once
filed, the annexation petition will be available for inspection and copying at
the office of (state the name of the proposed annexing municipality) located
at (state the address of the municipal offices of the proposed annexing
municipality)."; and
(C)  be accompanied by an accurate map identifying the area proposed for
annexation.
(iv)  A county may not mail with the notice required under Subsection
(2)(b)(i)(A) any other information or materials related or unrelated to the
proposed annexation.
(c) (i)  After receiving the certificate from the county as provided in
Subsection (2)(b)(i)(B), the proposed annexing municipality shall, upon
request from the person or persons who filed the notice of intent under
Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A), provide an annexation petition for the annexation
proposed in the notice of intent.
(ii)  An annexation petition provided by the proposed annexing municipality
may be duplicated for circulation for signatures.
(3)  Each petition under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be filed with the city recorder or town clerk, as the case may be, of the
proposed annexing municipality;
(b)  contain the signatures of:
(i)  the owners of private real property that:
(A)  is located within the area proposed for annexation;
(B) (I)  subject to Subsection (3)(b)(i)(B)(II), covers a majority of the
private land area within the area proposed for annexation; and
(II)  covers 100% of the private land area within the area proposed for
annexation, if the area is within:
(Aa)  an agriculture protection area created under Title 17, Chapter 41,
Agriculture and Industrial Protection Areas; or
(Bb)  a migratory bird production area created under Title 23, Chapter 28,
Migratory Bird Production Area; and
(C)  is equal in value to at least 1/3 of the value of all private real
property within the area proposed for annexation; or
(ii)  if all the real property within the area proposed for annexation is
owned by a public entity other than the federal government, the owner of all
the publicly owned real property;
(c)  if the petition proposes the annexation of an area located within a
township, explain that if the annexation petition is granted, the area will
also be withdrawn from the township;
(d)  be accompanied by:
(i)  an accurate and recordable map, prepared by a licensed surveyor, of the
area proposed for annexation; and
(ii)  a copy of the notice sent to affected entities as required under
Subsection (2)(a)(i)(B) and a list of the affected entities to which notice
was sent;
(e)  if the area proposed to be annexed is located in a county of the first
class, contain on each signature page a notice in bold and conspicuous terms
that states substantially the following:
"Notice:
• There will be no public election on the annexation proposed by this
petition because Utah law does not provide for an annexation to be approved by
voters at a public election.
• If you sign this petition and later decide that you do not support the
petition, you may withdraw your signature by submitting a signed, written
withdrawal with the recorder or clerk of (state the name of the proposed
annexing municipality).  If you choose to withdraw your signature, you must do
so no later than 30 days after (state the name of the proposed annexing
municipality) receives notice that the petition has been certified.";
(f)  if the petition proposes the annexation of an area located in a county
that is not the county in which the proposed annexing municipality is located,
be accompanied by a copy of the resolution, required under Subsection
10-2-402(6), of the legislative body of the county in which the area is
located; and
(g)  designate up to five of the signers of the petition as sponsors, one of
whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor, and indicate the mailing
address of each sponsor.
(4)  A petition under Subsection (1) may not propose the annexation of all or
part of an area proposed for annexation to a municipality in a previously
filed petition that has not been denied, rejected, or granted.
(5)  A petition under Subsection (1) proposing the annexation of an area
located in a county of the first class may not propose the annexation of an
area that includes some or all of an area proposed to be incorporated in a
request for a feasibility study under Section 10-2-103 or a petition under
Section 10-2-125 if:
(a)  the request or petition was filed before the filing of the annexation
petition; and
(b)  the request, a petition under Section 10-2-109 based on that request, or
a petition under Section 10-2-125 is still pending on the date the annexation
petition is filed.
(6)  If practicable and feasible, the boundaries of an area proposed for
annexation shall be drawn:
(a)  along the boundaries of existing local districts and special service
districts for sewer, water, and other services, along the boundaries of school
districts whose boundaries follow city boundaries or school districts adjacent
to school districts whose boundaries follow city boundaries, and along the
boundaries of other taxing entities;
(b)  to eliminate islands and peninsulas of territory that is not receiving
municipal-type services;
(c)  to facilitate the consolidation of overlapping functions of local
government;
(d)  to promote the efficient delivery of services; and
(e)  to encourage the equitable distribution of community resources and
obligations.
(7)  On the date of filing, the petition sponsors shall deliver or mail a copy
of the petition to:
(a)  the clerk of the county in which the area proposed for annexation is
located; and
(b)  if any of the area proposed for annexation is within a township:
(i)  the legislative body of the county in which the township is located; and
(ii)  the chair of the township planning commission.
(8)  A property owner who signs an annexation petition proposing to annex an
area located in a county of the first class may withdraw the owner's signature
by filing a written withdrawal, signed by the property owner, with the city
recorder or town clerk no later than 30 days after the municipal legislative
body's receipt of the notice of certification under Subsection
10-2-405(2)(c)(i).
